Maine, session 132, LD257.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §1304, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 705, §2, is amended
by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
"Assisted project" does not include a project for which the Public Utilities Commission
approved a term sheet or contract or otherwise provided project-specific authorization or
approval pursuant to Title 35-A on or before June 29, 2021 or a project that is participating
in net energy billing and that meets the requirements of Title 35-A, section 3209-A,
subsection 7 or Title 35-A, section 3209-B.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 230, §1 and c. 411, §2,
is repealed.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 411, §§3 and 4, is
repealed.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3209-C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 411, §5 and corrected by
RR 2023, c. 2, Pt. A, §55, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 35-A MRSA §3209-D, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 411, §6, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
A. "Distributed generation resource" means an electric generating facility that uses a
renewable fuel or technology under section 3210, subsection 2, paragraph B‑3, is
located in the service territory of a transmission and distribution utility in the State, has
a nameplate capacity of at least one megawatt and not more than 2 megawatts and:
(1) Is a member of a cluster study conducted by the transmission and distribution
utility with which the distributed generation resource is seeking to interconnect; or
(2) Received required transmission approval from the New England independent
system operator on or before April 30, 2024.
Sec. 6. 35-A MRSA §3209-D, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 411, §6, is
repealed.
Sec. 7. 35-A MRSA §3209-E, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 411, §7, is repealed.
Sec. 8. 35-A MRSA §3209-F is enacted to read:
§3209-F. Net energy billing requirement prohibited
The commission may not by rule or order require a transmission and distribution utility
to allow a customer to participate in net energy billing. For the purposes of this section,
"net energy billing" means a billing and metering practice under which a customer of a
transmission and distribution utility has the ability to receive a bill credit or other
adjustment of the customer's transmission and distribution service bill by delivering
electricity to the transmission and distribution utility from an electric generating facility
owned or operated by that customer or in which that customer has a financial interest that
is located in the service territory of the transmission and distribution utility in the State.
Sec. 9. 35-A MRSA §3214, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 230, §2, is
further amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0705(01)

B. Set initial funding for programs based on an assessment of aggregate customer need
in periodic rate cases. The funding formula may not result in assistance being counted
as income or as a resource in other means-tested assistance programs for low-income
households. To the extent possible, assistance must be provided in a manner most
likely to prevent the loss of other federal assistance; and.
Sec. 10. 35-A MRSA §3214, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 230, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 11. 35-A MRSA §3623, sub-§3, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 604, §3, is
amended to read:
C. Satisfy the limits on net generating capacity established in subsection 2, paragraph
A; and
Sec. 12. 35-A MRSA §3623, sub-§3, ¶D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 353, §5, is
further amended to read:
D. Be highly efficient, as determined by the commission on a technology-specific
basis; and.
Sec. 13. 35-A MRSA §3623, sub-§3, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 604, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. 14. 36 MRSA §655, sub-§1, ¶V, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 682, §3, is
amended to read:
V. For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2025, solar energy equipment
that generates heat or electricity if: all of the energy is used on the site where the
property is located.
(1) All of the energy is used on the site where the property is located;
(2) The equipment is collocated with a net energy billing customer that is or net
energy billing customers that are subscribed to at least 50% of the facility's output;
or
(3) All of the energy is transmitted through the facilities of a transmission and
distribution utility and a utility customer or customers receive a utility bill credit
for the energy generated by the equipment pursuant to Title 35‑A, section 3209‑A
or 3209‑B and the generator of electricity entered into a fully executed
interconnection agreement with a transmission and distribution utility prior to June
1, 2024.
On or before April 1st of the first property tax year for which a taxpayer claims an
exemption under this paragraph, the taxpayer claiming the exemption shall file a report
with the assessor. The report must identify the property for which the exemption is
claimed and must be made on a form prescribed by the State Tax Assessor or a
substitute form approved by the State Tax Assessor. The State Tax Assessor shall
furnish copies of the form to each municipality in the State and make the forms
available to taxpayers.
Sec. 15. 36 MRSA §656, sub-§1, ¶L, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 682, §5, is
amended to read:
Page 2 - 132LR0705(01)

L. For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2025, solar energy equipment
that generates heat or electricity if: all of the energy is used on the site where the
property is located.
(1) All of the energy is used on the site where the property is located;
(2) The equipment is collocated with a net energy billing customer that is or net
energy billing customers that are subscribed to at least 50% of the facility's output;
or
(3) All of the energy is transmitted through the facilities of a transmission and
distribution utility and a utility customer or customers receive a utility bill credit
for the energy generated by the equipment pursuant to Title 35‑A, section 3209‑A
or 3209‑B and the generator of electricity entered into a fully executed
interconnection agreement with a transmission and distribution utility prior to June
1, 2024.
On or before April 1st of the first property tax year for which a taxpayer claims an
exemption under this paragraph, the taxpayer claiming the exemption shall file a report
with the assessor. The report must identify the property for which the exemption is
claimed and must be made on a form prescribed by the State Tax Assessor or a
substitute form approved by the State Tax Assessor. The State Tax Assessor shall
furnish copies of the form to each municipality in the State and make the forms
available to taxpayers.
Sec. 16. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§80, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 286, §1, is repealed.